Washington statutes.
RCW 35.42.010

Purpose.

It is the purpose of RCW 35.42.010 through 35.42.090 to supplement existing law for the leasing of space by cities and towns to provide for the leasing of such space through leases with an option to purchase and the acquisition of buildings erected upon land owned by a city or town upon the expiration of a lease of such land.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.42.010. Prior: 1959 c 80 s 1.]